Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8314
Sections; how construed.

Nothing in sections 71-8301 to 71-8314 is intended to authorize any certificate of need activities for facilities or to authorize the licensure of private practice health care services offices.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 120.